Washington statutes.
RCW 5.56.090

Testimony of prisoner, how obtained.

If the witness be a prisoner confined in a jail or prison within this state, an order for his or her examination in prison, upon deposition, or for his or her temporary removal and production before a court or officer, for the purpose of being orally examined, may be issued.

[ 2011 c 336 s 144; Code 1881 s 401; 1877 p 88 s 403; 1869 p 106 s 396; 1854 p 189 s 303; RRS s 1223.]